Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.130

General penalty.

Any person who does anything forbidden by chapter 32.04, 32.08, 32.12, 32.16 or 32.24 RCW of this title for which a penalty is not provided in this title, or in some other law of the state, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be punished accordingly.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.04.130. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 51; RRS s 3380.]